Utah statutes.
11-10-1.   Business license required -- Authorization for issuance, denial, suspension, or revocation by local authority.

(1)  As used in this chapter, the following have the meaning set forth in Section 32B-1-102:

(a)  "alcoholic product";

(b)  "club license";

(c)  "local authority"; and

(d)  "restaurant."

(2)  A person may not operate an association, a restaurant, a business similar to a business operated under a club license, or other similar business that allows a person to possess or consume an alcoholic product on the premises of the association, restaurant, club, or similar business premises without a business license.

(3) (a)  A local authority may issue a business license to a person who owns or operates an association, restaurant, club, or similar business that allows a person to hold, store, possess, or consume an alcoholic product on the premises. 

(b)  A business license issued under this Subsection (3) does not permit a person to hold, store, possess, or consume an alcoholic product on the premises other than as provided in Title 32B, Alcoholic Beverage Control Act.

(4)  A local authority may suspend or revoke a business license for a violation of Title 32B, Alcoholic Beverage Control Act.

(5)  A local authority shall set policy by written rules that establish criteria and procedures for granting, denying, suspending, or revoking a business license issued under this chapter.

(6)  A business license issued under this section does not constitute written consent of the local authority within the meaning of Title 32B, Alcoholic Beverage Control Act.

